Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1409YC (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1002, section 53, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 SEC. 53. PRESERVATION OF EXISTING RIGHTS. This division 3 of this Act is not intended to and shall not limit, modify, or 4 otherwise adversely affect any amount of tax credit issued, 5 awarded, or allowed prior to January July 1, 2023, nor shall it 6 limit, modify, or otherwise adversely affect a taxpayerâs right 7 to claim or redeem a tax credit issued, awarded, or allowed 8 prior to January July 1, 2023, including but not limited to any 9 tax credit carryforward amount. 10